Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1146.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1354.2. Flagship Niagara commemorative registration plate.(a) Plate.--The department, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission, shall replicate the Flagship Niagara commemorative registration plate that was released under former section 1354 (relating to Flagship Niagara commemorative registration plate). Upon application of any person, accompanied by a fee of $45 which shall be in addition to the registration fee, the department shall issue the plate for a passenger car, motor home, motorcycle, trailer or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds.(b) Use of fee.--Of each fee paid under subsection (a), $15 shall be deposited into the Flagship Niagara Account, which is 12345678910111213141516171819 established as a special account in the Historical Preservation Fund of the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission. The commission shall administer the account as follows:(1) To preserve, maintain and operate the Flagship Niagara.(2) After making a determination that there has been compliance with paragraph (1) for a fiscal year, to contribute to the fund.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1146PN1397 - 2 - 123456789